apertium-es-ssp/apertium-es-ssp.ssp.dix
<pardef n="/st.aëmewe__vblex">
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>st.aëmewe</l> 
        <r>st.aëmewe<s n="vblex"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e>
      <p>
        <l>st.aëmewe</l> 
        <r>st.aëmewe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>st.aëmewe</l> 
        <r>st.aëmewe<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>   
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>st.aëmewe</l> 
        <r>st.aëmewe<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e> 
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>st.aëmewe</l> 
        <r>st.aëmewe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>  
 <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>st.aëmewe</l> 
        <r>st.aëmewe<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s  n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>st.aëmewe</l> 
        <r>st.aëmewe<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s  n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>st.aëmowo</l> 
        <r>st.aëmewe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
     <e>
      <p>
        <l>st.aëmewe</l> 
        <r>st.aëmewe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
   

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>elaëmowo</l> 
        <r>st.aëmewe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>elaëmowo</l> 
        <r>st.aëmewe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ylaëmíwoo</l> 
        <r>st.aëmewe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ylaëmíwoo</l> 
        <r>st.aëmewe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>st.aëmewe</l> 
        <r>st.aëmewe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>st.aëmeweby</l> 
        <r>st.aëmewe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

  <e>
      <p>
        <l>st.aëmewe</l> 
        <r>st.aëmewe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>st.aëmeweby</l> 
        <r>st.aëmewe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


 <e>
      <p>
        <l>ylaëmèwei</l> 
        <r>st.aëmewe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ylaëmèweiby</l> 
        <r>st.aëmewe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
   <e>
      <p>
        <l>st.aëméwey</l> 
        <r>st.aëmewe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>st.aëméweybo</l> 
        <r>st.aëmewe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>elaëméwy</l> 
        <r>st.aëmewe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>elaëméwybo</l> 
        <r>st.aëmewe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
 
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ylaëmiwi</l> 
        <r>st.aëmewe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ylaëmiwibo</l> 
        <r>st.aëmewe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>


<pardef n="v.ôpob ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb__vblex">
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>v.ôpob ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb</l> 
        <r>v.ôpob<b/>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e>
      <p>
        <l>v.ôpob ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb</l> 
        <r>v.ôpob<b/>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>v.ôpob ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb</l> 
        <r>v.ôpob<b/>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>   
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>v.ôpob ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb</l> 
        <r>v.ôpob<b/>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e> 
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>v.ôpob ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb</l> 
        <r>v.ôpob<b/>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e> 
 <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>v.ôpob ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb</l> 
        <r>v.ôpob<b/>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s  n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>v.ôpob ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb</l> 
        <r>v.ôpob<b/>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s  n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>v.ôpob ahsòmémuhe:ômàmacb</l> 
        <r>v.ôpob<b/>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
     <e>
      <p>
        <l>v.ôpob ahsòmémuhe:ômàmacb</l> 
        <r>v.ôpob<b/>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
   

   <e>
      <p>
        <l>v.ôpob ahsòmimuhe:ômàmacb</l> 
        <r>v.ôpob<b/>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>v.ôpob ahsòmimuhe:ômàmacb</l> 
        <r>v.ôpob<b/>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


 <e>
      <p>
        <l>v.ôpob ylahsòmìmuhe:ômàmacb</l> 
        <r>v.ôpob<b/>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>v.ôpob ylahsòmìmuhe:ômàmacb</l> 
        <r>v.ôpob<b/>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

  <e>
      <p>
        <l>v.ôpob ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb</l> 
        <r>v.ôpob<b/>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>v.ôpob ahsòmémuho:ômàmucby</l> 
        <r>v.ôpob<b/>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

  <e>
      <p>
        <l>v.ôpob ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb</l> 
        <r>v.ôpob<b/>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>v.ôpob ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb</l> 
        <r>v.ôpob<b/>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


 <e>
      <p>
        <l>v.ôpob ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb</l> 
        <r>v.ôpob<b/>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>v.ôpob ahsòmémuho:ômàmucby</l> 
        <r>v.ôpob<b/>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
   <e>
      <p>
        <l>v.ôpob ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb</l> 
        <r>v.ôpob<b/>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>v.ôpob ylahsòmémuho:ômamucby</l> 
        <r>v.ôpob<b/>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>v.ôpob ylahsòmémuho:ômamucb</l> 
        <r>v.ôpob<b/>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>v.ôpob ylahsòmémuho:ômamucby</l> 
        <r>v.ôpob<b/>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
 
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>v.ôpob ilahsòmémuho:ômàmucb</l> 
        <r>v.ôpob<b/>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>v.ôpob ilahsòmémuho:ômàmucby</l> 
        <r>v.ôpob<b/>ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

<e lm="st.aëmewe"><par n="/st.aëmewe__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="v.ôpob ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb"><par n="v.ôpob ahsòmémuho:ômàmucb__vblex"/></e>
